Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-8801
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-8801
to 44-8808 shall be known and may be cited as the Health Insurance Exchange
Navigator Registration Act.

Laws 2013, LB568, § 1.